Maine, session 132, LD1207.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §484, sub-§11 is enacted to read:
11. Special provision; solar energy development. In the case of a proposed solar
energy development, the development will not be constructed within 100 feet of a river,
stream or brook. This subsection does not apply to vegetation removal activities necessary
for shade management or road or utility line crossings within 100 feet of a river, stream or
brook.
As used in this subsection, "solar energy development" means a development that uses a
solar energy system consisting of ground-mounted solar panels to convert solar energy to
electrical energy and includes generating facilities and associated facilities.
Page 1 - 132LR0976(03)